Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.095

Homicide investigative tracking system—Supervision management and recidivist tracking (SMART) system.

(1) There is created, as a component of the homicide investigative tracking system, a supervision management and recidivist tracking system called the SMART system. The office of the attorney general may contract with any state, local, or private agency necessary for implementation of and training for supervision management and recidivist tracking program partnerships for development and operation of a statewide computer linkage between the attorney general's homicide investigative tracking system, local police departments, and the state department of corrections. Dormant information in the supervision management and recidivist tracking system shall be automatically archived after seven years. The department of corrections shall notify the attorney general when each person is no longer under its supervision.

(2) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) "Dormant" means there have been no inquiries by the department of corrections or law enforcement with regard to an active supervision case or an active criminal investigation in the past seven years.

(b) "Archived" means information which is not in the active database and can only be retrieved for use in an active criminal investigation.

[ 1998 c 223 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1998 c 223: "The legislature finds that increased communications between local law enforcement officers and the state department of corrections' community corrections officers improves public safety through shared monitoring and supervision of offenders living in the community under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.

Participating local law enforcement agencies and the local offices of the department of corrections have implemented the supervision management and recidivist tracking program, whereby each entity provides mutual assistance in supervising offenders living within the boundaries of local law enforcement agencies. The supervision management and recidivist tracking program has helped local law enforcement solve crimes faster or prevented future criminal activity by reporting offender's sentence violations in a more timely manner to community corrections officers by rapid and comprehensive electronic sharing of information regarding supervised offenders. The expansion of the supervision management and recidivist tracking program will improve public safety throughout the state." [ 1998 c 223 s 1.]